California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 overpayment when there is a failure on the part of an applicant or recipient to perform an act constituting a condition of eligibility, if the failure is caused by an error made by a state agency or a county welfare department, and if the amount of the grant received by the applicant or recipient would not have been different had the act been performed.

(e) Prior to effectuating any reduction of current grants to recover past overpayments, the recipient shall be advised of the proposed reduction and of the recipient’s entitlement to a hearing on the propriety of the reduction.

(f) If the department determines after a hearing that an overpayment has occurred, the county providing the public social services shall seek to recover the overpayment in accordance with subdivision (c), including any amount paid while the hearing process was pending. That adjustment shall be permitted
 concurrently with any suit for restitution, and recovery of overpayment by adjustment shall reduce by the amount of such recovery the extent of liability for restitution.

(g) (1) (A) If the individual responsible for an overpayment is no longer receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), recovery of overpayments received under that chapter shall not be attempted when the outstanding overpayments are less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). When an overpayment collection is attempted, reasonable cost-effective efforts at collection shall be implemented. Reasonable efforts shall include notification of the amount of the overpayment and that repayment is required. The department shall define reasonable cost-effective collection methods. In cases involving fraud, every effort shall be made to collect the overpayments regardless of the amount.

(B) The department may establish a threshold higher than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if it determines that a higher threshold is more cost effective, but the department shall not set a lower threshold than that amount.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a county shall discharge an overpayment if the county determines that the overpayment has been caused by a major systemic error or negligence, as those terms are defined by the department.

(3) (A) Except in cases involving overpayments due to fraud, a county shall only establish an overpayment if the overpayment occurred within 24 months prior to the date that the county discovered the overpayment.

(B) A county shall not collect any portion of a nonfraudulent overpayment that
 occurred more than 24 months prior to the date the county discovered an overpayment.

(h) If the individual responsible for the overpayment to the assistance unit becomes a member of another assistance unit, recovery of overpayments shall be made against the individual or the individual’s present assistance unit, or both.

(i) (1) If an overpayment has been made to an assistance unit that is no longer receiving public social services, recovery shall be made by appropriate action under state law.

(2) This paragraph shall be operative when the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) can automate its provisions. Except in cases involving overpayments due to fraud or an investigation into suspected fraud, if the individual responsible for the overpayment has not received aid under Chapter 2
 (commencing with Section 11200) for 36 consecutive months or longer, the county shall deem an overpayment uncollectible and discharge, in accordance with existing discharge procedures, an overpayment received under that chapter.

(j) A civil or criminal action shall not be commenced against any person based on alleged unlawful application for or receipt of public social services if the case record, or any consumer credit report used in the civil or criminal case of that person for the purpose of determining that the overpayment, has not been made available to that person or has been destroyed after the expiration of the three-year retention period pursuant to Section 10851.

(k) (1) When an underpayment or denial of public social services occurs and, as a result, the applicant or recipient does not receive the amount to which the applicant or recipient is
 entitled, the county shall provide public social services equal to the full amount of the underpayment unless prohibited by federal law. In cases that have both an underpayment and an overpayment, the underpayment shall be offset against the overpayment prior to correcting any remaining underpayment.

(2) Any corrective payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall be disregarded in determining the income of the family and shall be disregarded in determining the resources of the family in the month the corrective payment is made and in the following month.

(l) This subdivision is applicable only to applicants, recipients, and payees under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9. Any suits to recover overpayments described in subdivision (f) shall be brought on behalf of the county by the county counsel unless the board of supervisors delegates that duty
 to the district attorney by ordinance or resolution.

(m) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instruction that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations are adopted.

(n) The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than January 1, 2023. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, any emergency regulation previously adopted pursuant to this section. The initial adoption of regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and
 necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State, and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(o) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later, except as otherwise specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 27.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Conditionally operative July 1, 2022, or later date, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.1.

(a) In addition to Section 11004, this section shall apply to the CalWORKs program.

(b) The amount of any CalWORKs grant overpayment shall be the difference between the grant amount the assistance unit actually received and the grant amount the assistance unit would have received under the semiannual reporting, prospective budgeting system if a county error had not occurred and if the recipient had timely, completely, and accurately reported, as required under Sections 11265.1 and 11265.3. An overpayment shall not be established based on any differences between the amount of income the county prospectively determined for the recipient for the semiannual reporting period and the income the recipient actually received during that period, provided the recipient’s
 report was complete and accurate.

(c) A CalWORKs grant underpayment shall not be established based on any differences between the amount of income the county prospectively determined for the recipient for the semiannual reporting period and the income the recipient actually received during that period.

(d) (1) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2013. A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with the act that added this section no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in
 paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.

(e) (1) Commencing August 1, 2021, a CalWORKs overpayment that is established for a current CalWORKs case on or after that date, shall be classified as an administrative error if any overpaid benefit month or months occurred during the period between April 2020 and the end of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic, or June 30, 2022, whichever date is sooner.

(2) If an overpayment is classified as an administrative error pursuant to paragraph (1), and the overpayment also includes overpaid months before or after the period specified in paragraph (1), the entire overpayment shall be classified as an administrative error.

(3) An overpayment classified as an administrative error pursuant to this subdivision shall not be reclassified after the state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic ends, but shall remain an administrative
 error, unless the overpayment is determined to be fraudulent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 41.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

Any special need allowance for mileage and for the expenses of the operation and maintenance of an automobile shall be fixed to operate in a uniform manner throughout the state by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.5.

All money paid to a recipient or recipient group as aid is intended to help the recipient meet his individual needs or, in the case of a recipient group, the needs of the recipient group, and is not for the benefit of any other person. Aid granted under this part or Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act to a recipient or recipient group and the income or resources of such recipient or recipient group shall not be considered in determining eligibility for or the amount of aid of any other recipient or recipient group.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.

Except as basic needs are provided pursuant to a life care agreement governed by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1770) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, to the extent permitted by federal law the director shall formulate and promulgate regulations which establish criteria for evaluation of allowances provided to recipients of public assistance under the following circumstances:

1. Applicants or recipients who reside in a facility operated by an organization that provides for any or all of the basic needs of the individual.

2. Applicants or recipients who reside under a living arrangement paid for and controlled by an organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each grant of aid under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13000) shall be increased in the amount of two dollars ($2), as a basic need of the recipient. Grant increases provided pursuant to this section are specifically intended to assure that the tax shift provisions of the Property Tax Relief Act of 1972 will not work a hardship on welfare recipients. Such grant increases shall not replace, but are in addition to any other grant, including any cost-of-living adjustment or any grant for special needs for which recipients affected by this section are or may become eligible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.2.

(a) The department may provide for the delivery of public assistance payments at any time during the month.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, any person entitled to the receipt of public assistance payments may authorize payment to be directly deposited by electronic fund transfer into the person’s qualifying account at the insured depository financial institution of the person’s choice under a program for direct deposit by electronic transfer as established in this section. The direct deposit to a qualifying account shall discharge the department’s obligation with respect to the payment.

(2) Each
 county treasurer shall make an agreement with one or more insured depository financial institutions participating in the Automated Clearing House pursuant to the local rules, and shall, by December 1, 2001, establish a program for the direct deposit by electronic fund transfer of payments to any person entitled to the receipt of public assistance benefits who authorizes the direct deposit of the benefits into the person’s qualifying account at the insured depository financial institution of the person’s choice. Each county treasurer has no obligation to determine whether the account at the insured depository financial institution of the person’s choice is a qualifying account, as defined in paragraph (3).

(3) For purposes of this section, a “qualifying account” is one of the following:

(A) A demand deposit or savings account at an insured
 depository financial institution that is offered directly by the insured depository financial institution on its internet website or through its branches and that is in the name of the person entitled to receipt of public assistance payments.

(B) A prepaid account, or a demand deposit or savings account offered by or through an entity other than an insured depository financial institution, that meets all of the following:

(i) The account is held at an insured depository financial institution.

(ii) The account is set up to meet the requirements for direct or passthrough deposit or share insurance payable to the person entitled to the receipt of public assistance payments by the Federal Deposit Insurance
 Corporation in accordance with Part 330 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund in accordance with Part 745 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iii) The account is not attached to a credit or overdraft feature that is automatically repaid from the account unless the credit or overdraft feature has no fee, charge, or cost, whether direct, required, voluntary, or involuntary, or the credit or overdraft feature complies with the requirements for credit offered in connection with a prepaid account under the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.

(iv) The account complies with all of the requirements, and provides the holder of the account with all of the consumer
 protections, that apply to an account under the rules implementing the Electronic Fund Transfer Act (EFTA) (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.).

(4) A person or entity that is not an insured depository financial institution that offers, maintains, or manages an account that does not comply with paragraph (3) shall not solicit, accept, or facilitate the direct deposit of public assistance payments to the account.

(5) For purposes of this section, each county treasurer and county welfare department shall not be held liable for authorizing a direct deposit of public assistance payments into an account, designated by the person entitled to receipt of public assistance benefits, that does not comply with paragraph (3).

(6) This subdivision shall apply in each county that offers a program for direct deposit by electronic funds transfer to some or all of its employees.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Insured depository financial institution” means a state or national bank, a state or federal savings and loan association, a mutual savings bank, or a state or federal credit union that holds deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration.

(2) “Prepaid account” has the same meaning as that term is defined in regulations under the EFTA.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, administer, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(2) Any all-county letters or similar written instructions that the department elects to issue pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be issued no later than October 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 546, Sec. 4.   (SB 497)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when payment of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of this part is made by mail, the envelope shall bear on its face:

(a) A statement that it is not to be forwarded.

(b) A statement that address correction is requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.5.

This section shall be applicable only to those aid recipients under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500) of this part.

Alternate methods of providing assistance may be used for recipients of aid who are found to be unable to manage the cash grant to their own best advantage. Such payment may only be used when it is determined by the county director that the recipient has, by reason of his physical or mental condition, such inability to manage funds that making cash payments to him would be contrary to his welfare.

Aid under this section may be paid to a guardian or conservator on behalf of the recipient. If no guardian or conservator is available, aid shall be paid, in whole or in part, to some other individual who is interested in or concerned with the welfare of the recipient. In the absence of superseding federal law, the department shall make regulations for the payment of aid under this section and for the selection of such substitute payee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.6.

(a) The department may establish and operate a central benefit issuance system in one or more counties whereby grants in aid paid pursuant to this part or any other program administered by the department and cash payments under CalFresh may be issued directly to the recipient by the Controller. Warrants representing payments under this system shall be drawn on the Central Benefit Issuance Fund. In counties where the central benefit issuance system is in operation, Sections 15150, 15150.5, 15151, and 15153, and any other related section shall not apply with respect to benefits.

(b) (1) In a case of emergency or immediate need by a recipient that cannot be
 addressed in a timely manner, as set forth in existing law, by issuance of a Controller’s warrant, those counties, acting as agents for the department, shall authorize payment to be issued by the Central Benefit Issuance System directly to recipients from a department account designated for that purpose.

(2) Any check issued pursuant to paragraph (1) that remains unpaid for 180 days after it becomes payable shall be void and shall be canceled by the department and redeposited to the account from which it is drawn. The department shall cause to be printed prominently on the face of any check issued pursuant to paragraph (1) a notice of the requirements of this paragraph.

(c) The department shall ensure that aid issued through a central benefit issuance system is delivered timely and that the system does not reduce the accessibility of benefits and services to the
 recipient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 38.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.9.

It is a cause for revocation of a permit or license by the department or the State Department of Health Services for any person, association, or corporation that maintains, conducts, or, as manager or officer or in any other administrative capacity, assists in maintaining or conducting any nursing facility, any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled, or nonmedical board and care facility to obtain, as an additional cost of care, aid allocated to a recipient for his or her personal or incidental needs or to obtain and fail to deliver such aid allocation to the recipient. The department or the State Department of Health Services shall initiate license or permit revocation proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 7.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11007.

Aid granted to a recipient of public assistance shall not constitute a lien upon any property of the recipient.

The cost of hospitalization furnished by a county to the recipient shall not constitute a lien against the personal property or personal effects of the recipient, or against an interment plot as defined in Section 7022 of the Health and Safety Code.

The cost of hospitalization furnished by a county to a recipient, other than a recipient of aid to families with dependent children, on or after May 21, 1963, and any judgment obtained by a county against the recipient to obtain repayment of such costs, shall not constitute a lien against the real property of the recipient, and no lien shall be taken therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.

(a) In order that recipients of public assistance may become self-supporting and productive members of their communities, it is essential that they be permitted to earn money without a proportionate deduction in their aid grants. It is the intention of the Legislature to promote this objective and the department, in implementing public assistance laws, is directed to do so in the light of this objective.

(b) To the extent required by federal law, earned income of a recipient of aid under any public assistance program for which federal funds are available shall not be considered income or resources of the recipient, and shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled. In computing the amount of income determined to be available to support a recipient, the value of currently used resources shall be included, except as provided in Section 11018.

(c) This section does not apply to recipients under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 229.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.1.

To the extent permitted by federal law, income, including but not limited to seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) of any income, received by a recipient of aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500), or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 13500) of this part shall not be considered income or resources of the recipient and shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the Social Security Pass-On.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1520.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.2.

To the extent permitted by federal law, lump sum retroactive social security payments received under the provisions of Public Law 92-5 shall not be considered in determining the amount payable to any person under aid to families with dependent children, aid to the blind, aid to the aged, aid to the potentially self-supporting blind, aid to the needy disabled, Medi-Cal, or county aid and relief to indigents.

This section shall not be construed to limit the provisions of Section 11008.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.3.

The 1974 income tax refunds and the lump sum fifty dollars ($50) payment received under the provisions of Public Law 94-12 shall not be considered as income or resources in determining the amount payable to any person under the aid to families with dependent children program, the Burton-Moscone-Bagley Citizens’ Income Security Act for Aged, Blind and Disabled Californians, the aid to the potentially self-supporting blind program, the Medi-Cal Act, in computing net income or financial liability under Section 14005.7 or 14005.12, or county aid and relief to indigents.

This section shall not be construed to limit the provisions of Section 11008 or 11008.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.4.

Property taxes (1) as defined in Section 20584 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, which are postponed by a person pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581) or 3 (commencing with Section 20641) of Part 10.5 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and (2) as defined in Section 20511 and 20512 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, on which a person is granted assistance pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) of Part 10.5 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and renters credits as defined in Section 17053.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall not be considered as income or resources in determining the amount payable to any person under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

This section shall not be construed to limit the provisions of Section 11008 or 11008.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.6.

In addition to the requirements contained in Section 11008, when determining the income of a recipient, to the extent permitted by federal law, relocation assistance benefits received by public assistance recipients pursuant to the Housing Act of 1964, Public Law 88-560, and benefits received under the Manpower Development and Training Act of 1962, Public Law 87-415 as amended, and the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, Public Law 89-10, shall not be considered income or resources of the recipient and shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled. The provisions of this section shall not apply to recipients who receive benefits under the Manpower Development and Training Act of 1962, Public Law 87-415 as amended, or the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, Public Law 89-10, when the recipient, for other than medical reasons, changes his training program on his own initiative more than once during a two-year period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1601.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.7.

Neither funds distributed pursuant to U.S. Public Law 90-507 (82 Stat. 860) nor property derived therefrom shall be considered in determining the eligibility of or the amount payable to any person under federal, state, or local laws, plans, rules, or regulations relating to welfare services or payments of any type of public assistance to needy persons, including, but not limited to, aid to families with dependent children, aid to the blind, aid to the aged, aid to the potentially self-supporting blind, aid to the needy disabled or medical assistance recipients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.8.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any reduction in the state and county costs of public assistance payments to recipients of aid under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of this part, which result from increased social security benefits voted by Congress shall be applied to increasing the monthly grants to all recipients of aid under that chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after October 1, 1972, the maximum or average grants contained in Sections 13100 and 13101 and the need standard of recipients contained in departmental regulations on July 1, 1972, that were established pursuant to such sections shall be increased in the amount of twelve dollars ($12). Such increases shall be reflected in the grants that are payable on October 1, 1972. Such increases shall not replace, but are in addition to any other grant, including any cost-of-living adjustment or any grant for special needs for which recipients affected by this section are or may become eligible.

There is hereby appropriated from the general fund in every county an amount sufficient to pay the total nonfederal costs of the increase in aid grants provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.9.

Loans or grants provided for in Section 69650 of the Education Code are deemed to be for educational purposes and to the extent permitted by federal law, shall not be used or considered in determining the need of any applicant or recipient or as part of the amounts used to determine the eligibility of any applicant or recipient for public assistance programs.

This section shall not apply to recipients under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.10.

To the extent permitted by federal law the value of any loan or grant to any undergraduate student made or insured under any program administered by the State Scholarship and Loan Commission or a college accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges shall not be considered in determining eligibility or the amount of the grant.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11008.8 by Stats. 1974, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.11.

To the extent permitted by federal law, any stipends, meals, transportation, or other income received by a senior companion pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 9520) of Division 8.5 shall not be considered as income or resources of the recipient and shall not be deducted from the amount of any public assistance or aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1121.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.12.

To the extent permitted by federal law, any stipend, meals, transportation, or other income received by a foster grandparent pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 9540) of Division 8.5 shall not be considered as income or resources of the recipient and shall not be deducted from the amount of any public assistance or aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.13.

To the extent permitted by federal law and consistent with other provisions of this chapter, in determining the eligibility and amount of aid under this division for a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States for whom an affidavit of support was executed prior to December 19, 1997, the income and resources of the person shall be deemed to include the income and resources of any person who had executed an affidavit of support on behalf of the person and the spouse of that person as provided in Section 408 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 608) and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 63.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.135.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in determining the eligibility and amount of aid for a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States under this division, the income and resources of the person shall be deemed to include the income and resources of any person who has executed an affidavit of support on behalf of the person and the spouse of that person as provided in Subtitle C (commencing with Section 421) of Title IV of Public Law 104-193, as amended by Public Law 104-208, and any subsequent amendments thereto, subject to any exceptions required by those provisions, including exceptions for indigents and battered spouses.

(b) As a condition of eligibility, the sponsored applicant or recipient shall provide information regarding the income and resources of any person, and the spouse of that person, who has executed an affidavit of support on behalf of the person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 64.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.14.

(a) The income of the natural or adoptive parent, the spouse of the natural or adoptive parent, and the sibling of an eligible child unless the sibling is not included in the number of needy persons used to calculate the maximum aid payment pursuant to Section 11450.17, living in the same home with an eligible child shall be considered available, in addition to the income of an applicant for or recipient of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), for purposes of eligibility determination and grant computation. Except as otherwise provided in this section, in the case of a parent or legal guardian of a minor who is also the parent of an eligible child, the income of the parent or guardian shall be considered available to the minor parent and eligible child to the same extent that income to a
 stepparent is considered available to an assistance unit. Income through child support for a child not included in the number of needy persons used to calculate the maximum aid payment pursuant to Section 11450.17 shall not be considered available to any member of the assistance unit.

(b) This section shall be applied to all applicants for, and recipients of, aid provided through the CalWORKs program under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), except that income of a guardian of an applicant for, or recipient of, foster care benefits provided under Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Chapter 2 shall not be considered available to the ward or to a child of the ward for the purpose of eligibility determination and grant computation under Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Chapter 2. This section shall be applied regardless of whether federal financial participation is available for the family.

(c) This section shall become operative on November 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 729, Sec. 2.   (SB 380)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative November 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.15.

Notwithstanding Sections 11008.14 and 11267, the department shall exercise the options of disregarding earned income of a dependent child or ward of the juvenile court derived from participation in the Job Training Partnership Act of 1982 (Public Law 97-300), a dependent child or ward of the juvenile court who is a full-time student pursuant to the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 (Public Law 97-369), a dependent child or ward of the juvenile court 16 years of age or older who is a participant in the Independent Living Program pursuant to the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-272), and, on and after January 1, 2012, a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400 who is participating in a transitional independent
 living case plan pursuant to the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351), provided that the child’s Independent Living Program case plan states that the purpose of the employment is to enable the child to gain knowledge of needed work skills, work habits, and the responsibilities of maintaining employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 31.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.17.

(a) To the extent required by federal law, amounts paid pursuant to any federal law enacted in 1988 to provide reparation payments to redress the injustice done to United States citizens and residents of Japanese ancestry who were interned during World War II shall not be considered as income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility to receive Medi-Cal benefits or public assistance benefits or the amount of those benefits.

(b) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, amounts paid by the Canadian government to provide reparation payments to redress the injustice done to persons of Japanese ancestry who were
 interned in Canada during World War II shall not be considered as income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility to receive Medi-Cal benefits or public assistance benefits or the amount of those benefits.

(c) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, where the reparation payments described in subdivisions (a) and (b) have been converted to another form, amounts of otherwise excess nonexempt resources equal to the amount of these reparation payments received by the individual or inherited by the spouse of the individual, or both, shall not be considered as resources in determining eligibility for Medi-Cal.

(d) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, reparation payments described in subdivisions (a) and (b), or where the
 reparation payments described in subdivisions (a) and (b) have been converted to another form, amounts of resources equal to the amount of these reparation payments, received by the deceased Medi-Cal beneficiary or inherited by the deceased spouse of that beneficiary, or both, shall be exempt from estate recovery by the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Section 14009.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 65.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.18.

The department shall implement the state option in Section 402(a)(36) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 602(a)(36)) and as that statute may hereinafter be amended, which provides that the value of support assistance or maintenance assistance, or both, provided in the form of any in-kind income on the basis of need to, or on behalf of, a family by all entities described in Section 402(a)(36) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 602(a)(36)) and as that statute may hereinafter be amended shall be disregarded as income.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1402, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.19.
